District of Columbia statutes.
31-5238.01

Fees deposited in Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund.

All fees collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund established by § 31-1202 and expended for the purposes authorized by the Fund.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-87, § 9a
as added Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2203, 52 DCR 7503
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of Captive Insurance Company Enhancement Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-215, December 7, 2004, law notification 52 DCR 459).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of the Captive Insurance Company Enhancement Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-481, July 19, 2004, 51 DCR 7811).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Captive Insurance Company Enhancement Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-549, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 10336).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2203 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).